Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 4. Upper Colorado River Basin Compact
/s/ Charles A. Carson Charles A. Carson Commissioner for the State of Arizona /s/ Clifford H. Stone Clifford H. Stone Commissioner for the State of Colorado /s/ Fred E. Wilson Fred E. Wilson Commissioner for the State of New Mexico /s/ Edward H. Watson Edward H. Watson Commissioner for the State of Utah /s/ L. C. Bishop L. C. Bishop Commissioner for the State of Wyoming /s/ Grover A. Giles Grover A. Giles, secretary Approved: /s/ Harry W. Bashore Harry W. Bashore Representative of the United States of America.

Click to view

Editor's notes. —

There is paragraph (a)(ii) in Article XIV and no subsection (b) in Articles II, IV, XI, XII, XIII, XIV or XIX of this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Preamble. —

“Appointment Interstate Streams Commissioner.

Whereas, the twenty-sixth Wyoming legislature passed an act entitled ‘An act relating to the appointment of interstate streams commissioner and assistant commissioners to negotiate agreements relative to interstate streams and providing for the governor of Wyoming to notify the governors of other states as to the appointment of said commissioner, detailing the authority of said commissioner,’ which said act was approved on the 24th day of February, 1941, by the governor; (now section 71-2601, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1945) and

“Negotiation of Compact.

Whereas, under the authority of said act, the state engineer, L. C. Bishop, acted as commissioner, who, together with the duly appointed commissioners of the states of Arizona, Colorado, New Mexico and Utah and the representative of the United States of America negotiated a compact or agreement now called the ‘Upper Colorado River Basin Compact’ and which was signed on the 11th day of October, A. D. 1948, at the city of Santa Fe, state of New Mexico; and

“Joint Ratification.

Whereas, the said act of the twenty-sixth Wyoming legislature further contained the following provision: ‘that any such compact or compacts, agreement or agreements so entered into by such states and the United States shall not be binding or obligatory upon any of the contracting parties thereto unless or until the same shall have been ratified and approved by the legislature of each of such states and the congress of the United States.’”

Little Snake river. —

Laws 1941, ch. 64, authorized the negotiation of a compact or agreement between the states of Wyoming and Colorado concerning the disposition of the waters of the Little Snake river and the streams tributary thereto. No separate Little Snake River Compact was made; however, an agreement concerning the Little Snake river, as authorized by the 1941 act, is incorporated in article XI of the Upper Colorado River Basin Compact.